Alaska, session 34, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 18.95 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 18.95.050. Fundamental rights. (a) A person may not deny another 05 person, based on race, religion, color, national origin, age, physical or mental 06 disability, sex, gender, marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, or housing status, the 07 following: 08 (1) access to and use of public spaces in a manner allowed by law; 09 (2) medical and dental care; 10 (3) gainful employment to support independence and community 11 living; 12 (4) documentation to meet voter eligibility requirements; 13 (5) clean, safe, and sanitary living conditions, including access to a 14 trash receptacle, toilet, and shower; 15 (6) medical privacy as provided by law; 01 (7) reasonable privacy and autonomy, including the right to give 02 informed consent; 03 (8) reasonable accommodation in the interest of family unity and 04 support when applicable and appropriate; 05 (9) equal treatment, without harassment, mistreatment, or fear of 06 retribution from public servants; 07 (10) the ability to accept, offer, and eat food in a public space; 08 (11) access to and participation or non-participation in a religious 09 community of the individual's choosing; 10 (12) occupation of a legally parked vehicle or legally anchored, 11 moored, or stored watercraft belonging to the individual or to a person who has given 12 the individual permission to occupy the vehicle or watercraft; and 13 (13) the ability to rest or seek shelter from the elements in a public 14 space if doing so does not obstruct pedestrian or vehicular traffic. 15 (b) In a civil action for violation of this section, a court may award a 16 prevailing plaintiff injunctive and declaratory relief, actual damages, and attorney fees 17 and costs. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.